Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0943.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 31a. (1) In order to ensure compliance with the provisions of this act, after each election the secretary of state may shall audit election precincts. (2) The secretary of state shall prescribe the procedures for election audits that include reviewing the documents, ballots, and procedures used during an election as required in section 4 of article II of the state constitution of 1963. The secretary of state and, except as otherwise provided under subsection (3), (6), county clerks shall conduct election audits, including statewide election audits, as set forth in the prescribed procedures. Each county clerk, or the designee of a county clerk as provided under subsection (6), who conducts an election audit shall provide the results of the election audit to the secretary of state not later than 20 days after the election audit. (3) The secretary of state shall train and certify county clerks, the county clerk's staffs, and, if required under subsection (3), (6), the designee of a county clerk , for the purpose of conducting election tabulation audits of precincts randomly selected by the secretary of state in the counties. An election The secretary of state shall randomly select precincts from each county for the tabulation audit that total 1% of the registered electors in the county, or 3 precincts in the county, whichever is greater. Each tabulation audit must include an audit a hand tally of the results of at least 1 race in each selected precinct. selected for an audit. A statewide election tabulation audit must include an audit a hand tally of the results of at least 1 statewide race or statewide ballot question in a each selected precinct. selected for an audit. An audit conducted under this section is not a recount and does not change any certified election results. For each presidential election, the tabulation audit must include a hand tally of the results of the presidential contest in each selected precinct. (4) The results of a tabulation audit conducted under subsection (3) must be compared to the unofficial election returns. Each county clerk, or the designee of a county clerk as provided under subsection (6), who conducts a tabulation audit shall submit a report regarding the tabulation audit results to the appropriate board of county canvassers and the secretary of state before the board of county canvassers certifies the results of any election as provided under section 822. If there is a discrepancy reported between the tabulation audit results and the unofficial election returns that cannot be resolved, the county clerk, the designee of the county clerk as provided under subsection (6), or the secretary of state may require tabulation audits of additional precincts before the board of county canvassers certifies the results of any election as provided under section 822. Once the tabulation audit is complete, the board of county canvassers must use the results of the tabulation audit when certifying the results of the election as provided under section 822. (5) The secretary of state shall supervise each county clerk, or the county clerk's designee as provided under subsection (3), (6), in the performance of election audits and tabulation audits conducted under this section. (6) (3) If a county clerk is an officer or member of the governing body of a national, state, or local political party, or is a precinct delegate of a political party, that county clerk is prohibited from having any role in the direction, supervision, or conduct of an election audit or tabulation audit, and that county clerk must, subject to this subsection, appoint a designee to conduct any election audit in that county. The county clerk shall not appoint a designee who is an officer or member of the governing body of a national, state, or local political party, or is a precinct delegate of a political party. (4) Each county clerk, or the designee of a county clerk as provided under subsection (3), who conducts an election audit under this section shall provide the results of the election audit to the secretary of state within 20 days after the election audit. Sec. 822. (1) The board of county canvassers shall then proceed without delay to canvass the returns of votes cast for all candidates for offices voted for and all questions voted on at the election, according to the precinct returns, early voting returns, and absent voter counting board returns filed with the probate judge or presiding probate judge by the county, city, and township clerks, or for local elections according to the precinct returns filed with the county clerk, and according to any corrected returns based on the tabulation audit results reported under section 31a, and must, subject to this subsection, conclude the canvass at the earliest possible time and, except as otherwise provided in section 842(2), in every case no later than the fourteenth day after the election. The board of county canvassers shall not conclude the canvass until the tabulation audit required under section 31a is complete. (2) Subject to section 842(2), if the board of county canvassers fails to certify the results of any election for any officer or proposition by the fourteenth day after the election as provided, the board of county canvassers shall immediately deliver to the secretary of the board of state canvassers all records and other information pertaining to the election. Subject to section 842(2) and (3), the board of state canvassers shall meet immediately and make the necessary determinations and certify the results not later than the twentieth day after the election. The board of county canvassers and all other county staff necessary to complete the canvass must be present at all times during the completion of the canvass by the board of state canvassers. All costs associated with the completion of the canvass must be borne by the county involved. (3) It is the ministerial, clerical, and nondiscretionary duty of each board of county canvassers, and each of the members of the board of county canvassers, to certify election results based solely on the statements of returns from the election day precincts, early voting sites, and absent voter counting boards in the county and any corrected returns. (4) As used in this section and section 842, "to certify" means to make a signed, written statement.